Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.096

Cooperation with workforce training and education coordinating board.

The college board shall cooperate with the workforce training and education coordinating board in the conduct of the board's responsibilities under RCW 28C.18.060 and shall provide information and data in a format that is accessible to the board.

[ 1991 c 238 s 79.]